Utah statutes.
32A-8-102 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Application and renewal requirements.

(1)  Each person seeking an alcoholic beverage manufacturing license of any kind under this chapter shall file a written application with the department, in a form prescribed by the department.  The application shall be accompanied by:

(a)  a nonrefundable application fee of $250;

(b)  an initial license fee of $3,250 unless otherwise provided in this chapter, which is refundable if a license is not granted;

(c)  a statement of the purpose for which the applicant has applied for the alcoholic beverage manufacturing license;

(d)  written consent of the local authority;

(e)  a bond as specified by Section 32A-8-105;

(f)  evidence that the applicant is carrying public liability insurance in an amount and form satisfactory to the department;

(g)  evidence that the applicant is authorized by the United States to manufacture alcoholic beverages;

(h)  a signed consent form stating that the licensee will permit any authorized representative of the commission, department, or any law enforcement officer to have unrestricted right to enter the premises;

(i)  in the case of an applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company, proper verification evidencing that the person or persons signing the application are authorized to so act on behalf of the partnership, corporation, or limited liability company; and

(j)  any other documents and evidence the department may require by rule or policy to allow complete evaluation of the application.

(2) (a)  All alcoholic beverage manufacturing licenses expire on December 31 of each year.

(b)  Persons desiring to renew their license shall submit by no later than November 30 of the year the license expires:

(i)  a completed renewal application to the department; and

(ii)  a renewal fee in the following amount:

(A)  $2,500, except for an alcoholic beverage manufacturing license described in Subsection (2)(b)(ii)(B); or

(B)  $1,200 for a winery license if the winery licensee produced less than 20,000 gallons of wine in the calendar year preceding the year in which the licensee seeks renewal.

(c)  Failure to meet the renewal requirements results in an automatic forfeiture of the license effective on the date the existing license expires. Renewal applications shall be in a form prescribed by the department.

(3)  To ensure compliance with Subsection 32A-8-106(6), the commission may suspend or revoke an alcoholic beverage manufacturing license if the manufacturing licensee does not immediately notify the department of any change in:

(a)  ownership of the licensee;

(b)  for a corporate owner, the:

(i)  corporate officers or directors; or

(ii)  shareholders holding at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the corporation; or

(c)  for a limited liability company:

(i)  managers; or

(ii)  members owning at least 20% of the limited liability company.

